en: wheat grit
sv: vetegrits

en: puffed wheat
de: Weizenpops
fr: blé soufflé
hr: nabujala pšenica
it: frumento soffiato

en: whole wheat, whole grain wheat, wholegrain wheat, wholewheat
ar: قمح كامل
bg: пълнозърнеста пшеница
da: fuldkornshvede
de: Vollkornweizen, Weizenvollkorn
el: σίτος ολικής αλέσεως
es: trigo integral
fi: täysjyvävehnä
fr: blé complet
hr: pšenična od cjelovitog zrna, cjelovito zrno pšenice
hu: teljes kiőrlésű búza
it: frumento integrale
lt: viso kviečių rupiniai, viso kvietiniai rupiniai, viso kvietinės rupiniai, viso kvietinis rupiniai
nb: sammalt hvete
nl: volkorentarwe, volkoren tarwe
pl: pszenica z pełnego przemiału, pszenica pełnoziarnista, pszenne pełnoziarniste
pt: trigo integral
sk: polnozrnata pšenica
sl: pšenični polnozrnati
sr: integralna pšenična
sv: fullkornsvete, fullkorn av vete
zh: 全麥小麥

en: british wholegrain wheat
de: britisches Weizenvollkorn
hr: britanska cjelovita pšenica
it: grano integrale britannico

en: whole grain cereal products
hr: proizvodi od žitarica od cjelovitog zrna, cjelovite žitarice
it: prodotti a base di cereali integrali

en: wheat flakes, wheatflakes
bg: пшеница люспи
ca: flocs de blat
cs: pšeničné vločky
de: Weizenflocken
es: copos de trigo
et: nisuhelbed
fi: vehnähiutale
fr: flocons de blé, flocon de blé, pétales de blé
hr: pšenične pahuljice
hu: búzapelyhek
it: fiocchi di frumento
ja: 小麦フレーク
lt: kviečių dribsniai, kvietiniai dribsniai, kvietinės dribsniai, kvietinis dribsniai
nb: hveteflak
nl: tarwevlokken
pl: płatki pszenne, chrupki pszenno-żytnie
pt: flocos de trigo
ro: fulgi de grâu
sl: pšenični kosmiči
sv: veteflingor, veteflinga
th: เกล็ดข้าวสาลี

en: malted wheat flakes
de: Malzweizenflocken
es: copos de trigo malteado
fr: flocons de blé malté
hr: sladne pšenične pahuljice
it: fiocchi di frumento maltato

en: whole wheat flakes
ca: flocs de blat integral
de: Vollkorn-Weizenflocken, Weizenvollkornflocken
es: copos de trigo integral
fi: täysjyvävehnähiutale
fr: pétales de blé complet, flocons de blé complet
hr: cjelovite pšenične pahuljice, pšenične pahuljice od cjelovitog zrna
hu: teljes kiőrlésű búzapehely
it: Fiocchi di grano interi
lt: pilno grūdo kviečių dribsniai, pilno grūdo kvietiniai dribsniai, pilno grūdo kvietinės dribsniai, pilno grūdo kvietinis dribsniai
nl: volkoren tarwevlokken
pt: flocos de trigo integral, płatki pszenne pełnoziarniste
sv: fullkornsveteflingor, fullkorn veteflingor, fullkorn veteflinga

en: whole wheat groats
bg: пълнозърнест пшеничен шрот
cs: celozrnny pšeničny šrot, celozrnný pšeničný šrot
da: groftmalet fuldkornshvedemel
de: Weizenvollkornschrot
el: Αλεσμένος σίτος ολικής αλέσεως
fi: täysjyvävehnärouhe, täysjyvävehnärouhetta
fr: blé complet égrugé
hr: pšenična prekrupa od cjelovitog zrna
hu: teljes kiőrlésű búzadara
it: cruschello di frumento integrale
sl: pšenični polnozrnati drobljenec
sr: integralna pšenična prekrupa
sv: fullkornsvetekross

en: wheat malt
cs: pšeničný slad
de: Weizenmalz
es: malta de trigo
fi: vehnämallas
fr: malt de blé, malt de froment, blé malté
hr: pšenični slad, pšenično sladno
hu: búzamaláta
it: malto di frumento, malto di grano
lt: kviečių salyklas, kvietiniai salyklas, kvietinės salyklas, kvietinis salyklas
nl: tarwemout
pl: słód pszenny, słód pszeniczny
pt: Malte de trigo
sv: vetemalt, mältade vetekorn, malt av vete

en: wheat fiber
bg: пшенични влакна, пшенични фибри
cs: pšeničná vláknina
da: hvedefibre
de: Weizenfaser, Weizenfasern
es: fibras de trigo
fi: vehnäkuitu
fr: fibre de blé, fibres de blé
hr: pšenična vlakna
hu: búzarost
it: fibra di frumento, fibre di frumento
lt: kviečių ląsteliena, kviečių skaidulos, kvietiniai ląsteliena, kvietiniai skaidulos, kvietinės ląsteliena, kvietinės skaidulos, kvietinis ląsteliena, kvietinis skaidulos
nl: tarwevezel, tarwevezels
pl: błonnik pszenny, błonnik pszeniczny
pt: fibras de trigo
ro: fibră de grâu, fibre de grâu
ru: Пшеничные волокна, пищевые волокна пшеничные
sv: vetefiber, Vete fiber
tr: buğday lifi

en: gluten free wheat fiber
bg: безглутенови пшенични влакнини
hr: bezglutenska pšenična vlakna
it: fibra di frumento senza glutine
nl: glutenvrije tarwevezel
pl: błonnik pszenny bezglutenowy

en: wheat stalk fiber
de: Weizenhalmfaser
hr: vlakna stabljike pšenice
it: fibra di gambo di grano

en: wheat bran
af: koringsemels
bg: пшенични трици, пшеничени трици
ca: segó de blat
cs: pšeničné otruby
da: vetekli
de: Weizenkleie, Weizenspeisekleie
el: πίτουρο σταριού, σταροπίτουρο
es: salvado de trigo
fi: vehnälese
fr: son de blé, son de froment
hr: pšenične mekinje, pšeničene mekinje
hu: búzakorpa
it: crusca di frumento
ja: 小麦ふすま
kk: бидай кебек
lt: kviečių sėlenos, kvietiniai sėlenos, kvietinės sėlenos, kvietinis sėlenos
lv: kviešu klijas
nb: hvetekli
nl: tarwezemelen, tarwezemel
pl: otręby pszenne
pt: farelo de trigo
ro: tărâțe de grâu
ru: отруби пшеничные
sl: pšenični otrobi
sv: vetekli

en: einkorn wheat, einkorn
bg: еднозърнест лимец
ca: espelta petita
da: enkorn
de: Einkorn
es: escaña menor, escanda menor, espelta pequeña, escaña cultivada
fi: einkorn-vehnä, einkorn
fr: petit épeautre, engrain
hr: jednozrna pšenica
hu: alakor, alakor búza
it: piccolo farro, farro monococco
ja: ヒトツブコムギ
la: Triticum monococcum
nl: eenkoren, eenkoorn, einkorn
pt: einkorn
sv: enkornsvete

en: einkorn flour
bg: брашно от лимец, лимецово брашно
de: Einkornmehl, Einkorn-Mehl
fr: farine de petit épeautre
hr: jednozrno brašno
it: farina di farro monococco

en: whole grain einkorn flour
bg: пълнозърнесто брашно от лимец
de: Einkornvollkornmehl, Einkorn-Vollkornmehl
hr: brašno od cjelovitog zrna jednozrna
it: farina di piccolo farro integrale, farina di farro monococco integrale

en: wheat groats
de: Weizengraupen
fi: vehnärouhe
fr: gruau de blé
hr: pšenična krupica
it: semola di grano
ru: крупа пшеничная
sv: vetekross

az: Manna yarması
pl: kasza manna, kasza manna z pszenicy
sr: griz

en: whole wheat kernels
da: fuldkornshvedekerner
sv: fullkornskärnor av vete